Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4310.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. (1) Each instance of overseas travel by the governor that is funded at the expense of the taxpayer is subject to the approval of the legislature by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house of the legislature by a record roll call vote. (2) A concurrent resolution to approve overseas travel by the governor under subsection (1) must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The dates the governor will travel. (b) The location of where the governor will travel to. (c) The purpose of the travel.